Massachusetts, session 194th, S2178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Whereas the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, pursuant to section 57 of 
chapter 7 of the Massachusetts General Laws, has established a policy to foster an inclusive 
marketplace that offers competitive opportunity for businesses as diverse as the people of the 
commonwealth; and whereas the Commonwealth of Massachusetts pursuant to section 58A of 
chapter 7 of the Massachusetts General Laws, has established a Supplier Diversity Office or 
“SDO” to implement the supplier diversity objectives of the commonwealth, or more 
specifically, to effect the purposes of sections 57 to 61, inclusive, of said chapter 7; and whereas 
the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, acting through agencies of the executive branch, enters 
into contracts with businesses to facilitate the delivery of services and/or activities for the 
commercial and/or personal benefit of residents of the Commonwealth; it is the intention of the 
general court to take meaningful actions to better understand the inclusiveness of the 
Massachusetts marketplace as it relates to businesses as diverse as the people of the 

of 5 13 commonwealth. To achieve the purposes as stated in this section and sections 2 and 3, inclusive, 
this Act shall be known as the Transparency and Accountability in Procurement Act. 
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 3, inclusive, of this act, the following words shall 
have the following meanings, unless a contrary intent is clearly indicated: - 
“Business”, means a corporation, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability 
company, or any other organization formed for the purpose of engaging in a commercial 
function; provided that said corporation, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability 
company, or other organization has annual revenue equal to or greater than one hundred million 
dollars. 
“Black-owned Business”, means a business that is owned and controlled by one or more 
Black persons or African Americans. 
“Minority Business Enterprise” or “MBE”, means a business certified pursuant to section 
61 of chapter 7 of the General Laws owned and controlled by one or more socially or 
economically disadvantaged persons. Such disadvantage may arise from cultural, racial, chronic 
economic circumstances or background or other similar causes. For purposes of this Act, such 
persons shall include Blacks or African Americans and Western Hemisphere Hispanics. 
''Certified business enterprises” means minority business enterprises and woman business 
enterprises, certified pursuant to section 61 of chapter 7 of the General laws, and as both terms 
are defined in this section. 
“Non-certified businesses” shall mean Black-owned businesses, Western Hemisphere 
Hispanic-owned businesses, and “Women-owned” businesses. 

of 5 34  ''Women business enterprise'' or ''WBE'', means a business certified pursuant to section 
61 of chapter 7 of the General laws that is both owned and controlled, by one or more women 
who have invested in an ongoing business free of conversion rights. 
“Women-owned Business”, means a business that is both owned and controlled by one or 
more women. 
"Non-profit corporation" means all corporations organized for a purpose consistent with 
section 4 of chapter 180 of the General Laws and which has annual revenue equal to or greater 
than one hundred million dollars. 
''State authority'' a body politic and corporate constituted as a public instrumentality of 
the commonwealth and established by an act of the General Court to serve an essential 
governmental function and that has annual revenue equal to or greater than one hundred million 
dollars; provided, however, that state authority shall not include: (1) a state agency; (2) a city or 
town; (3) a body controlled by a city or town; or (4) a separate body politic for which the 
governing body is elected, in whole or in part, by the general public or by representatives of 
member cities or towns. 
''Hospital'', means a hospital licensed or certified by the Department of Public Health 
pursuant to section 51 of Chapter 111 or other applicable law, with an emergency department, 
and the teaching hospital of the University of Massachusetts Medical School. 
“Institution of higher education” means an educational institution domiciled in the 
Commonwealth and that (1) admits as regular students only persons having a certificate of 
graduation from a school providing secondary education, or the recognized equivalent of such a 
certificate, or persons who meet the requirements of section 1091(d) of 20 United States Code; 

of 5 56 (2) is legally authorized to provide a program of education beyond secondary education; (3) 
provides an educational program for which the institution awards a bachelor’s degree or provides 
not less than a 2-year program that is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, or awards a 
degree that is acceptable for admission to a graduate or professional degree program, subject to 
review and approval by the Secretary; (4) is a public or nonprofit institution; (5) is accredited by 
a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association, or if not so accredited, is an institution 
that has been granted preaccreditation status by such an agency or association that has been 
recognized by the United States Secretary of Education for the granting of preaccreditation 
status, and said Secretary has determined that there is satisfactory assurance that the institution 
will meet the accreditation standards of such an agency or association within a reasonable time; 
and (6 has annual revenue equal to or greater than one hundred million dollars. 
''Museum'', an institution or entity located in the commonwealth that: (i) is operated by a 
nonprofit corporation, trust, association, public agency, or educational institution; (ii) is operated 
primarily for educational, scientific, historic preservation, cultural or aesthetic purposes; (iii) 
owns, borrows, cares for, exhibits, studies, archives or catalogs property; and (iv) has annual 
revenue equal to or greater than one hundred million dollars. 
''SDO'' or ''Supplier Diversity Office'', the commonwealth's supplier diversity office as 
designated by section 58A and section 61 of chapter 7 of the General Laws. The Supplier 
Diversity Office is the successor agency to the state office of minority and women business 
assistance. 

of 5 76  SECTION 3. The SDO shall promulgate regulations for the annual collection and 
reporting of procurement activity as such activity relates to certified business enterprises and 
non-certified businesses by businesses, nonprofit corporations, and state authorities. 
In addition to annually collecting and reporting such procurement activity, the SDO shall 
submit, by April 30 of each year, an annual report that details by business, museum, institution of 
higher education, hospital, nonprofit corporation, and state authority each entity’s procurement 
activity with certified business enterprises and non-certified business enterprises. Said annual 
report shall be submitted to the governor, lieutenant governor, and the general court. Said annual 
report shall also be made available to the public via the SDO’s website